Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 5
Working Conditions Generally

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1913, No. 235, § 3: approved Mar. 29, 1913. Emergency declared.

Acts 1987, No. 489, § 6: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 31, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that citizens of Arkansas are being denied or restricted in their ability to obtain immediate and locally available pharmacy services and that this act is immediately necessary for the protection and preservation of the health, safety, and welfare of the people. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-5-101. Suitable temperature, humidity, and air space required.

In every factory, mill, workshop, mercantile establishment, laundry, or other establishment, adequate measures shall be taken for securing and maintaining a reasonable, and as far as possible, an equable temperature consistent with the reasonable requirements of the manufacturing process.

No unnecessary humidity which would jeopardize the health of employees shall be permitted.

In every room, apartment, or building used as a factory, mill, workshop, mercantile establishment, laundry, or other place of employment, sufficient air space shall be provided for every employee which in the judgment of the Director of the Division of Labor or of his or her deputies and inspectors is sufficient for the employees' health and welfare.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 6469; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-401; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5329.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (c).

11-5-102. Removal of gas, effluvia, and dust required.

All factories, mills, workshops, mercantile establishments, laundries, and other establishments shall be kept free from gas or effluvia arising from any sewer, drain, privy, or other nuisance on the premises.

All poisonous or noxious gases arising from any process and all dust which is injurious to the health of persons employed which is created in the process of manufacturing within the above-named establishments shall be removed as far as practicable by ventilators, exhaust fans, or other adequate devices.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 6470; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-402.

11-5-103. Cleaning required.

All decomposed, fetid, or putrescent matter and all refuse, waste, and sweepings of any factory, mill, workshop, mercantile establishment, laundry, or other establishment shall be removed at least once each day and be disposed of in such manner as not to cause a nuisance.

All cleaning, sweeping, and dusting shall be done as far as possible outside of working hours, but if done during working hours, shall be done in such a manner as to avoid, as far as possible, the raising of dust and noxious odors.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 6471; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-403.

11-5-104. Wet floors — Certain precautions required.

In all establishments where any process is carried on which makes the floors wet, the floors shall be constructed and maintained with due regard for the health of the employees.

Gratings or dry standing room shall be provided wherever practicable at points where employees are regularly stationed.

Adequate means shall be provided for drainage and for the prevention of leakage or seepage to lower floors.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 3; Pope's Dig., § 6471; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-403.

11-5-105. Safe doors, stairways, and elevators required.

All doors used by employees as entrances to or exits from factories, mills, workshops, mercantile establishments, laundries, or other establishments of a height of two (2) stories or over shall open outward and shall be so constructed as to be easily and immediately opened from within in case of fire or other emergencies.

Proper and substantial handrails shall be provided on all stairways.

Lights shall be kept burning at all main stairs, stair landings, and elevator shafts in the absence of sufficient natural light.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any mercantile establishments having fewer than three (3) female employees.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 4; Pope's Dig., § 6472; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-404.

11-5-106. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the prohibition of workplace conduct calculated to injuriously affect the morals of the female employees, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 289, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1937, No. 323, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 6473; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-405.

11-5-107. Inspection of working place — Findings.

The Director of the Division of Labor or any of his or her deputies or inspectors shall have the right to enter any factory, mill, workshop, mercantile establishment, laundry, or other establishment where three (3) or more persons are employed for the purpose of making inspections and enforcing the provisions of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111.

They are empowered upon finding any violation of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111 by reason of unsanitary conditions which will endanger the health of the employees therein employed, by reason of neglect to remove and prevent fumes and gases or odor injurious to employees, by reason of the failure or refusal to comply with any requirement of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111, or by reason of the inadequacy or insufficiency of any plan, method, practice, or device employed in assumed compliance with any of the requirements of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111 to pass upon and to make a written finding as to the failure or refusal to comply with any requirement of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111 or as to adequacy or sufficiency of any practice, plan, or method used in or about any place mentioned in §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111 in supposed compliance with any of the requirements of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 6474; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-406; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5330.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-5-108. Order to correct conditions — Issuance.

The Director of the Division of Labor or any of his or her deputies or inspectors may issue a written order to the owner, manager, superintendent, or other person in control or management of the place or establishment for the correction of any condition caused or permitted in or about the place or establishment in violation of any of the requirements of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111, or of any condition, practice, plan, or method used therein or thereabouts in supposed compliance with any requirement of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-111 but which are found to be inadequate or insufficient, in any respect, to comply therewith, and shall state in the order how the conditions, practices, plans, or methods, in any case, shall be corrected and the time within which they shall be corrected, a reasonable time being given in the order therefor.

One (1) copy of the order shall be delivered to the owner, manager, superintendent, or other person in control or management of the place or establishment, and one (1) copy shall be filed in the office of the Division of Labor.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 6; Pope's Dig., § 6474; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-406; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5331.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b).

11-5-109. Order to correct conditions — Conclusiveness — Action to set aside.

The findings and orders shall be prima facie valid, reasonable, and just and shall be conclusive unless attacked and set aside in the manner provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

The owner or owners, manager, superintendent, or other person in control or management of any place or establishment covered by this chapter, and directly affected by any finding or order provided for in §§ 11-5-107 and 11-5-108, may, within fifteen (15) days from the date of the delivery to him, her, or them of a copy of the order as provided for in §§ 11-5-107 and 11-5-108, file a petition setting forth the particular cause of objection to the order and findings in a court of competent jurisdiction against the Director of the Division of Labor.

The action shall have precedence over all other causes of a different nature and shall be tried and determined as other civil causes in the court.

If the court is in session at the time the cause of action arises, the suit may be filed during the term and stand ready for trial after ten (10) days' notice.

Either party may appeal but shall not have the right to sue out a writ of error from the trial court.

The appeal shall at once be returnable to the proper appellate court at either of its terms and shall have precedence in the appellate court over other causes of a different nature.

In any trial under this section, the burden shall be upon the plaintiff to show that the findings and order complained of are illegal, unreasonable, or unjust to the plaintiff.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, §§ 6, 7; Pope's Dig., §§ 6474, 6475; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-406, 81-407; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5332.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b)(1).

11-5-110. Order to correct conditions — Penalties for noncompliance.

Upon the failure or refusal of the owner, manager, superintendent, or other person in control or management of a place or establishment, to comply with an order issued pursuant to § 11-5-108 within the time therein specified, unless it has been attacked and suspended or set aside as provided for in § 11-5-109, the Director of the Division of Labor or his or her deputy or inspectors shall have full authority and power to close the place or establishment, or any part of it that may be in an unsanitary or dangerous condition or contain immoral influences in violation of any requirement of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-110 or order, until such time as the condition, practice, or method is corrected.

Any person in control or management of any establishment included in § 11-5-109 who shall fail or refuse to comply with any written order issued to the person by the director or any of his or her deputies or inspectors, for the correction of any condition caused or permitted therein which endangers the health of the employees therein or which does not comply with the law governing those establishments, shall be punished as provided in § 11-5-111.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, §§ 6, 8; Pope's Dig., §§ 6474, 6476; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-406, 81-408; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5333.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-5-111. Penalty for violation of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-110.

Any employer violating the provisions of §§ 11-5-101 — 11-5-110 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, the employer shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Each day's violation shall constitute a separate offense and shall be punished as such.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 323, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 6477; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-409.

11-5-112. Separate facilities for males and females required.

There shall be provided in every factory, manufacturing establishment, workshop, or other place where six (6) or more males and females are employed separate toilets and washrooms for males and females.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall enforce the provisions of this section and shall give notice in writing to employers violating it.

Upon failure to comply with the provisions of this section after thirty (30) days from the notice, the employers shall be liable to penalties provided in subsection (c) of this section.

Any firm, person, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Each day shall constitute a separate offense.

This section shall not repeal any laws now in force but shall be cumulative thereto.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 265, §§ 1-4; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7116-7118; Pope's Dig., §§ 9102-9104; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-410 — 81-413; Acts 1997, No. 300, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5334.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b)(1).

11-5-113. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning seats to be furnished for females, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 300, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1913, No. 235, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7100, 7101; Pope's Dig., §§ 9082, 9083; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-620, 81-621.

11-5-114. Requiring use of out-of-state mail-order pharmacy.

It shall be unlawful for any employer providing pharmacy services, including prescription drugs, to employees as a part of a health care program to require the employee to obtain drugs from an out-of-state mail-order pharmacy as a condition of obtaining the employer's payment for the prescription drugs or to impose upon an employee not utilizing an out-of-state mail-order pharmacy designated by the employer a copayment fee or other condition not imposed upon employees utilizing the designated out-of-state mail-order pharmacy.

This section shall not apply to any employer who:

Offers, as a part of a health care program, health insurance coverage to employees that provides for payment of an equal portion of the cost to the employee for prescription drugs regardless of the supplier if the health insurance plan allows the employee freedom of choice in determining where the drugs are purchased; or

Had in force effective January 1, 1987, a mail-order prescription drug plan for employees.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to health care programs in existence on March 30, 1987.

Any person or entity violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 489, §§ 1-4.

11-5-115. Prevention of workplace violence.

If an employer or an employer's employee or invitee has:

Suffered unlawful violence by an individual as defined by § 5-13-310, terroristic act; § 5-14-103, rape; §§ 5-13-201 — 5-13-203, battery; §§ 5-26-301 — 5-26-309, domestic battering and assault on a family or household member; or a crime of violence as defined by § 5-73-202(1);

Received a threat of violence by an individual which can reasonably be construed as a threat which may be carried out at the work site as defined by § 5-13-301, terroristic threatening; § 5-38-202, threatening a catastrophe; §§ 5-13-204 — 5-13-207, assault; or §§ 5-26-304 — 5-26-306, domestic battering; or

Been stalked or harassed at the work site as defined by § 5-71-213, loitering; § 5-39-203, criminal trespass; § 5-71-208, harassment; or § 5-71-229, stalking, the employer may, in addition to, or instead of, filing criminal charges against the individual, seek a temporary restraining order, a preliminary injunction, or an injunction under Arkansas Rule of Civil Procedure 65 prohibiting further unlawful acts by that individual at the work site, which shall include any place at which work is being performed on behalf of the employer.

Proof by a preponderance of the evidence of any action described in subsection (a) of this section shall constitute irreparable harm or damage to the employer or employer's employee or invitee.

Upon the granting of any restraining order, preliminary injunction, or injunction, the court may, among other appropriate orders:

Order the defendant not to visit, assault, molest, or otherwise interfere with the employer or the employer's operations or the employer's employee or invitee at the employer's work site;

Order the defendant to cease stalking the employer's employee or invitee at the employer's work site;

Order the defendant to cease harassment of the employer or the employer's employee or invitee at the employer's work site;

Order the defendant not to abuse or injure the employer, including the employer's property, or the employer's employee or invitee at the employer's work site;

Order the defendant not to telephone the employer or the employer's employee or invitee at the employer's work site; or

Such other necessary and appropriate relief as is deemed appropriate in the discretion of the court.

When necessary to protect the employer or the employer's employee, invitee, or property, and when authorized by the court, temporary restraining orders, preliminary injunctions, and injunctions granted under this section may be served upon the defendant by a peace officer, sheriff, constable, police officer, other law enforcement officer whose duty it is to preserve the peace, or by any other person authorized by law to serve process, with appropriate orders to the officials to enforce the court's order.

Unless specifically modified or terminated by the issuing judge, all orders and injunctions issued under this section shall have statewide validity and may be enforced by the issuing court for any violation anywhere in the state and by any court of competent jurisdiction within the state for violations which may occur within that court's jurisdiction.

All orders and injuctions issued under this section shall contain language directing appropriate law enforcement agencies to enforce the court's orders.

Unless lack of good faith is shown by clear and convincing evidence, an employer and an employer's agents who act in accord with this section shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and are immune from civil liability for actions taken under this section.

Any employer, or its employee or invitee, which does not utilize the procedures of this section shall not be liable for negligence, nor shall evidence of the same be admissible as evidence of negligence.

This section is not applicable in circumstances where an employee or the employee's representative is engaged in union organizing, union activity, a labor dispute, or any activity or action arguably protected by the National Labor Relations Act.

Nothing in this section is intended to change the act's preemptive regulation of legally protected activities nor to change the right of the State of Arkansas and its courts to regulate activities not protected by the act.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1084, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The National Labor Relations Act, referred to in (h)(1), is codified as 29 U.S.C.S. § 151 et seq.

11-5-116. Break time for expressing breast milk.

An employer shall provide reasonable unpaid break time each day to an employee who needs to express breast milk for her child in order to maintain milk supply and comfort.

To the extent possible, the break time required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall run concurrently with any paid or unpaid break time already provided to the employee.

An employer shall make a reasonable effort to provide a private, secure, and sanitary room or other location in close proximity to the work area, other than a toilet stall, where an employee can express her breast milk.

The room or location provided under subdivision (b)(1) of this section may include the employee's normal work space if the employee's normal work space meets the requirements of this section.

This section does not require an employer to provide break time if to do so would create an undue hardship on the operations of the employer.

The employee shall make reasonable efforts to minimize disruption to the employer's operations.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 621, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— Industrial Health Service Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-5-201 — 11-5-208. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The repeal of § 11-5-205 by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 4854, superseded the amendment of §
11-5-205 by Acts 2019, No. 315, § 769. The amendment by Act 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules”.

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Industrial Health Service Act, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 4854, effective July 1, 2019. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

11-5-201. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-414.

11-5-202. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-414.

11-5-203. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-421.

11-5-204. Acts 1947, No. 350, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-415, 81-416.

11-5-205. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-417; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 769.

11-5-206. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-418.

11-5-207. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-420.

11-5-208. Acts 1947, No. 350, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-419.

Subchapter 3
— Work Near High Voltage Lines

Effective Dates.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 11: Mar. 4, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly that existing laws presenting safety precautions to be taken in the proximity of overhead high voltage electrical lines for the prevention of accidents are inadequate; that this situation results in unnecessary danger to persons and property; and that enactment of this measure will provide the needed remedy. An emergency is therefore declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-5-301. Purpose.

This subchapter provides for the minimum precautions to be taken during any excavation, demolition, transportation of equipment, construction, repair, or operation in the proximity of energized overhead electrical lines.

The purposes of this subchapter are to provide for the protection of persons engaged in work of any nature in the vicinity of energized overhead electrical lines, to define the conditions under which work may be carried on safely, the procedures and means by which these conditions may be created, to provide penalties, and to provide remedies to those affected by violations of this subchapter.

This subchapter shall not apply to the direct employees of the State Highway Commission or the Arkansas Department of Transportation.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1401; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 1; 2017, No. 707, § 13.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in (b)(2), substituted “This” for “The provisions of this”, and substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department”.

11-5-302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authorized person” means:

Employees of an electrical utility company with respect to the electrical system of such a company, and the employees of a transportation system with respect to the electrical circuits of the system;

Employees of communication utilities, state, county, or municipal agencies having authorized circuit construction on the poles or structures of an electric utility company, transportation system, or communication system;

Employees of an industrial plant with respect to the electrical system of the plant;

Employees of a municipality with respect to the electrical system of the municipality; and

Employees of any electrical or communications contractor with respect to work under his or her supervision, having authorized construction work on the poles or structures of an electrical utility company, transportation system, or communication system;

“De-energizing” means removing the voltage from electrical conductors and grounding;

“Energized overhead electrical lines” means electrical lines which are energized at a potential of four hundred forty (440) volts or more, as measured between the conductor and the ground;

“Mechanical barrier” means a temporary device for separating and preventing contact between material or equipment and energized overhead electrical lines such as:

Insulating barriers; or

Nonconductive enclosures around conductors;

“Shall” is to be understood as mandatory;

“Should” is to be understood as advisory;

“Temporary relocation” means:

Removing electrical conductors from poles;

Elevating electrical conductors; or

Rerouting electrical conductors;

“Warning sign” means a weather-resistant sign of not less than five inches by seven inches (5" x 7") with a yellow background and black lettering reading as follows:

“WARNING — Unlawful to operate this equipment within ten feet (10') of energized overhead electrical lines.”

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 2; 1979, No. 716, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1402; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 2.

11-5-303. Application of National Electrical Safety Code.

The provisions of the National Electrical Safety Code, as adopted by the State of Arkansas, shall apply in the interpretation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1404; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 3.

11-5-304. Exceptions.

This subchapter does not apply to the construction, reconstruction, operation, and maintenance of energized overhead electrical lines and their supporting structures and associated equipment by an authorized electrical person nor to any authorized person engaged in the construction, reconstruction, operation, and maintenance of overhead electrical or communications circuits or conductors and their supporting and associated equipment of rail transportation systems, electrical transmission or distribution systems, or communications systems.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1403; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 4.

11-5-305. Penalty for violations.

Every person, firm, corporation, or association who violates any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and in addition thereof, if the violation results in physical or electrical contact with any energized overhead electrical line or conductor, and the violation is a proximate cause of any damage or injury to person or property, then the person, firm, corporation, or association violating the provisions of this subchapter shall be liable to the owner or operator of the electrical line or conductor for all damage to the facilities and for all loss, cost, and damages, including attorney's fees, incurred by way of property damage or personal injury by the owner or operator as a result of any such accidental contact.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to public utilities engaged in business in the State of Arkansas, nor their direct employees, nor to persons owning, leasing, or otherwise possessing a legal interest in the land upon which the energized overhead electrical line is located.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1410; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 10.

11-5-306. Use of alternative devices or methods.

Where specific devices or methods are mentioned in this subchapter, other devices or methods which will secure equally good results may be used, subject to the approval of the enforcing authority.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1403; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 5.

11-5-307. Notification.

When any person, firm, or corporation desires to temporarily carry on any function, activity, work, or operation in closer proximity to any energized overhead electrical line or conductor than permitted by this subchapter, the person or persons responsible for the work to be done shall promptly notify the Director of the Division of Labor and the operator or owner of the electrical lines in writing of the work to be performed and make appropriate arrangements with the operator of the electrical lines before proceeding with any work which would impair the clearances required by this subchapter.

The written notice shall be given to the owner or operator of the electrical lines by submitting notification to the manager of the nearest local office of the operator or owner of the electrical lines with a copy forwarded to the director.

The work shall be performed only after satisfactory mutual arrangements have been negotiated between the owner and operator of the electrical lines and the person or persons responsible for the work to be done.

The owner or operator of the electrical lines shall commence work on the mutual arrangements as provided herein within three (3) working days of the mutual arrangement. Once initiated, the clearance work will continue without unreasonable interruption to complete.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, § 9; 1979, No. 716, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1409; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 5335.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1).

11-5-308. Prohibited acts.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall, individually or through an agent or employee, and no person as an agent or employee of any person, firm, corporation, or association, shall perform, require, or permit any agent or employee to perform any function or activity upon any land, building, structure, highway, or other premises when it could be reasonably expected, during the performance of the activity, for any person or employee engaged in performing work connected with or related to the function or activity to move or to be placed in a position within ten feet (10') of any energized overhead electrical line or conductor, or when it could be reasonably expected for any part of any tool, equipment, machinery, or material to be used by any such person or employee to be brought within ten feet (10') of any such overhead line or conductor through any lateral, vertical, or swinging motion during the performance of that function or activity, unless and until danger from accidental contact with said overhead lines has been effectively guarded against in the manner hereinafter prescribed.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall, individually or through an agent or employee, and no person as an agent or employee of any person, firm, corporation, or association, shall store, operate, erect, maintain, move or transport any tools, machinery, equipment, supplies, materials, or other apparatus, house, other building, or any part thereof, within ten feet (10') of any energized overhead electrical line unless and until danger from accidental contact with the overhead line has been effectively guarded against in the manner hereinafter prescribed.

The commission of any act enumerated in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall be prohibited except where energized overhead electrical lines have been effectively guarded against danger from accidental contact, by either:

The erection of mechanical or insulating barriers to prevent physical contact with energized overhead electrical lines; or

De-energizing the overhead electrical lines and grounding.

Only in the case of either of such exceptions may the ten foot (10') clearance required be reduced. The required ten foot (10') clearance shall not be provided by movement of the lines through strains impressed by attachments or otherwise, upon the structures supporting the overhead lines, nor upon any equipment, fixtures, or attachments thereon.

If subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B) of this section are not practicable in the opinion of the owner or operator of the electrical lines and it is necessary to temporarily relocate the overhead electrical lines, mutually agreeable arrangements shall be made with the owner or operator of the overhead electrical lines for the temporary relocation.

In addition to the requirements of subdivisions (c)(1)(A) and (B) of this section, there shall be installed an insulated cage-type guard or protective device, approved by the Director of the Division of Labor, about the boom or arm of all equipment, except backhoes or dippers. Where the equipment includes a lifting hook device also approved by the director, all lifting lines shall be equipped with insulator links on the lift hook connection.

All mechanical barriers and all insulated protective devices and links referred to in this section shall be of such character and construction as are suited to the work operations and adequate for the electrical conditions to be encountered.

All mechanical barriers and all insulated protective devices and links shall be maintained in such functioning condition as to meet periodic inspection.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, §§ 5, 6; 1979, No. 716, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1405, 81-1406; Acts 1989, No. 752, §§ 6, 7; 2019, No. 910, § 5336.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the first sentence of (c)(4).

11-5-309. Warning signs.

The owner, agent, or employer responsible for the operation of equipment shall post and maintain in plain view of the operator on each crane, derrick, power shovel, drilling rig, hay loader, hay stacker, pile driver, or similar apparatus, any part of which is capable of vertical, lateral, or swinging motion, an approved weather-resistant warning sign legible at twelve feet (12') reading:

Warning signs shall be placed:

Within the equipment readily visible to operators of cranes and other equipment when at the controls of such equipment; and

On the outside of equipment in such number and locations as to be readily visible to mechanics or other persons engaged in the work operations.

Warning signs should not be less than five inches (5") in height and not less than seven inches (7") in width.

“WARNING — Unlawful to operate this equipment within ten feet (10') of energized overhead electrical lines.”

History.

Acts 1963, No. 148, §§ 7, 8; 1979, No. 716, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1407, 81-1408; Acts 1989, No. 752, § 9.

Subchapter 4
— Genetic Information in the Workplace

Cross References.

Genetic Research Studies Nondisclosure Act, §§ 20-35-101 et seq.

11-5-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Genetic Information in the Workplace Act”.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1407, § 1.

11-5-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid;

“Employer” means employer as the term is defined in Section 3(d) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938;

“Genetic information” means information derived from the results of a genetic test.

“Genetic information” shall not include:

Family history;

Results of a routine physical examination or test;

Results of a chemical, blood, or urine analysis;

Results of a test to determine drug use;

Results of a test for the presence of the human immunodeficiency virus; or

Results of any other test commonly accepted in clinical practice at the time it is ordered by the insurer;

“Genetic test” means a laboratory test of the DNA, RNA, or chromosomes of an individual for the purpose of identifying the presence or absence of inherited alterations in the DNA, RNA, or chromosomes that cause a predisposition for a clinically recognized disease or disorder.

“Genetic test” shall not include:

A routine physical examination or a routine test performed as a part of a physical examination;

A chemical, blood, or urine analysis;

A test to determine drug use;

A test for the presence of the human immunodeficiency virus; or

Any other test commonly accepted in clinical practice at the time it is ordered by the insurer; and

“RNA” means ribonucleic acid.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1407, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, referred to in this section, is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 203(d).

11-5-403. Prohibition of employer's use of genetic test or information.

An employer shall not seek to obtain or use a genetic test or genetic information of the employee or the prospective employee for the purposes of distinguishing between or discriminating against or restricting any right or benefit otherwise due or available to an employee or prospective employee.

An employer shall not require a genetic test of or require genetic information from the employee or prospective employee for the purposes of distinguishing between or discriminating against or restricting any right or benefit otherwise due or available to an employee or prospective employee.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1407, § 1.

11-5-404. Penalty for violation of § 11-5-403.

Any employer who violates the prohibitions of § 11-5-403 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and may be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1407, § 1.